Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CORRIDORS OF COMMERCE.new text end new text begin $150,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $150,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for the corridors of commerce program under Minnesota Statutes, section 161.088. new text end